Utah statutes.
26-42-104.   Enforcement by state and local health departments.

The state Department of Health and the local health departments shall enforce this chapter under the procedures of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, as an informal adjudicative proceeding, including:

(1)  notifying licensees of alleged violations of Section 26-42-103;

(2)  conducting hearings;

(3)  determining violations of this chapter; and

(4)  imposing civil monetary administrative penalties.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

